NO.5 ENGINE STALLS-AFTER START/AT IDLE [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


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5

ENGINE STALLS-AFTER START/AT IDLE

DESCRIPTION
•  The engine stops unexpectedly.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Poor fuel quality
•  Intake-air system restriction or clogging
•  Engine overheating
•  A/C system improper operation
•  Immobilizer system and/or circuit malfunction (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
•  Immobilizer system operating properly (Engine key is not programmed.) (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
•  PCM control relay malfunction
•  Glow system malfunction
•  Inadequate fuel pressure
•  Fuel pressure sensor related circuit malfunction
•  Fuel metering valve malfunction
•  Fuel pressure limiter malfunction
•  Fuel leakage
•  Fuel line clogging or restriction
•  Fuel filter clogging or restriction
•  Incorrect fuel injection timing
•  Erratic signal from CKP sensor
•  Erratic signal from CMP sensor
•  Supply pump malfunction
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Low engine compression
•  Improper valve timing
•  Exhaust system and/or catalyst converter restriction or clogging
•  EGR system malfunction
•  ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Accelerator positions sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  MAF/IAT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Diesel particulate filter restriction or damaged (High power-Euro 4)
•  Diesel particulate filter system malfunction (High power-Euro 4)
Предупреждение
The following troubleshooting flow chart contains the fuel system diagnosis and repair procedures. Read the following warnings before servicing the fuel system:
•  Fuel vapor is hazardous. It can easily ignite, causing serious injury and damage. Always keep sparks and flames away from fuel.
•  Fuel line spills and leakage are dangerous. Fuel can ignite and cause serious injury or death and damage. Fuel can also irritate skin and eyes. To prevent this, always complete “BEFORE REPAIR PROCEDURE” and “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE” described in this manual.

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Примечание
•  The following test should be performed for vehicles with the immobilizer system. Go to Step 7 for vehicles without an immobilizer system.
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
•  Engine will not start.
•  DTC P1260 is displayed.
Yes
Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 4.
No
Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
2
Is the coil connector securely connected to the coil?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Connect the coil connector securely.
Return to Step 1.
3
Does the security light illuminate?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect the instrument cluster and wiring harness.
4
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve the DTCs.
DTC
B1213, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2139, B2141, B2431, U2510
Yes
Go to appropriate DTC test.
No
Go to the next step.
5
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
•  Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
•  Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
No
Go to the next step.
6
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
•  Between PCM terminal 309 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
•  Between PCM terminal 301 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
No
Go to the next step.
7
Inspect the following:
•  Fuel quality (e.g.: include water contamination, winter/summer blend)
•  Fuel line/fuel filter clogging
•  Intake-air system restriction
Are all items normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 7.
8
Is the engine overheating?
Yes
Go to symptom troubleshooting “NO.17 COOLING SYSTEM CONCERNS-OVERHEATING”.
No
Go to the next step.
9
Примечание
•  Ignore DTC P0122, or P0123 while performing this test.
Disconnect the accelerator pedal position sensor connector.
Measure the voltage at the accelerator pedal position sensor connector VREF terminal (terminal 1) with the engine switch in the ON position.
Specification
4.5—5.5 V
Is the voltage normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect and repair or replace the following:
•  Instrument cluster
•  Wiring harness or connectors between accelerator pedal position sensor terminal 1 and instrument cluster terminal 2X
10
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTCs.
Are DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect for the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 236 or 231
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 241
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 307, 308 or 332)
•  Poorly connected vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
11
Does the engine start normally after warm-up?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to Step 14.
12
Inspect glow system operation
Is the glow system operation normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the malfunctioning parts according to the glow system operation inspection results.
13
Inspect fuel warmer system operation
Is the fuel warmer system operation normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace the malfunctioning parts according to the fuel warmer system operation inspection results.
14
Is there any restriction in exhaust system, catalytic converter or diesel particulate filter*?
Yes
Repair or replace if necessary.
No
Go to the next step.
15
Access RPM PID
Does the RPM PID indicate the engine speed during engine cranking?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to Step 18.
16
Примечание
•  The following test should be performed on vehicles with the A/C system. If the following test cannot be performed due to engine stalling, go to the next step.
•  Go to the next step for vehicles without the A/C system.
Connect a pressure gauge to the A/C line.
Turn the blower and A/C switches on.
Is the pressure within the specification?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
A/C is always on:
Go to symptom troubleshooting “NO.24 A/C ALWAYS ON OR A/C COMPRESSOR RUNS CONTINUOUSLY”.
Other symptoms:
Inspect the following:
•  Refrigerant charging amount
•  Cooling fan operation
17
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2. Access the following PID.
•  APP
Verify that the PID value when the accelerator pedal is depressed and/or released.
Is PID indicate normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect and repair or replace the following parts:
•  Accelerator pedal position sensor
18
Inspect for fuel leakage from fuel pipe
Is any fuel leakage found on the fuel pipe?
Yes
Repair or replace if necessary.
No
Go to the next step.
19
Visually inspect CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel
Are the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the malfunctioning parts.
20
Measure gap between CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel
Specification
1.5—2.5 mm {0.059—0.098 in}
Is the gap within the specification?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Adjust the CKP sensor position.
21
Visually inspect CMP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel
Are the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Inspect the following PIDs:
•  ECT
•  IAT
•  MAF
•  RPM
If the PID values are not as specified, repair or replace malfunctioning parts.
If the PID values are normal, go to the next step.
No
Replace malfunctioning parts.
22
Inspect fuel pressure sensor
Is the fuel pressure normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the common rail.
23
Inspect fuel metering valve
Is the fuel metering valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel pump.
24
Is the engine compression correct?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect for the following:
•  Damaged valve seat
•  Worn valve stem and valve guide
•  Worn or stuck piston ring
•  Worn piston, piston ring or cylinder
•  Improper valve timing
Service if necessary.
25
Inspect fuel injector
Is the fuel injector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace if necessary.
26
Inspect EGR system operation
Is the EGR system operation normal?
Yes
Remove and inspect the supply pump and the common rail. (standard power-Euro 4)
Go to the next step. (High power-Euro 4)
No
Repair or replace malfunctioning part according to EGR system operation results.
27
Check scheduled maintenance for following:
•  Fuel additive
•  Diesel particulate filter
Are these scheduled maintenances properly?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Carry out the scheduled maintenance properly.
28
Inspect the fuel additive amount.
Are there any fuel additives in fuel additive tank?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect and repair or replace for following:
•  Fuel additive hose (Fuel additive tank - fuel additive pump - fuel tank)
•  Fuel tank level sensor
29
Remove the diesel particulate filter.
Visually inspect for damaged at diesel particulate filter.
Are there detected any damaged?
Yes
Replace the diesel particulate filter.
No
Go to the next step.
30
Perform cooling air bypass valve operation inspection.
Does the cooling air bypass valve operation properly?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace malfunctioning part, according to inspection result.
31
Access following PIDs using the M-MDS.
•  CABVDC
•  CABVP
•  DPF_DIF
•  POST_CAT
Monitor the PIDs.
Are there any problems detected?
Yes
Inspect the suspect PID related wiring and components.
If okay inspect the fuel level sensor.
No
Remove and inspect the supply pump and the common rail.
32
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms. (See SYMPTOM DIAGNOSTIC INDEX [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting is completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, replace the PCM. (See PCM REMOVAL/INSTALLATION [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)

*  :High power-Euro 4